Utah statutes.
72-7-205.   Conditions for licensing of junkyard within 1,000 feet of
highway.
(1) The department may not grant a license for the establishment, maintenance,
or operation of a junkyard within 1,000 feet of the nearest edge of the right-
of-way of any highway on the interstate or primary systems unless the junkyard
is:
(a) screened by natural objects, plantings, fences, or other appropriate means
so the junkyard is not visible from the main-traveled-way of the system; and
(b) (i)  located within areas that are zoned for industrial use under county
or municipal ordinances; or
(ii)  located within unzoned industrial areas, determined by actual land uses
as defined by rules made by the department in accordance with Title 63G,
Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.
(2)  A junkyard controlled by this part may not be expanded or have its use
extended except by permission of the department under rules made by the
department.
